California, session 20252026, AB952.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2786.5 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2786.5. (a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(A) The Youth Offender Program Camp Pilot Program was launched by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in August 2023 at Growlersburg Conservation Camp #33 in Georgetown as a pilot program to temporarily allow incarcerated youth between 18 and 25 years of age, who have a Level III classification score or a Violent Administrative Determinant, the ability to participate in the conservation camp program on a case-by-case basis.(B) The pilot program showed great promise, and the department expanded the pilot program to Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp #12 in August 2024.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to make the Youth Offender Program Camp Pilot Program within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation permanent.(b) (1) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall make permanent the Youth Offender Program Camp Pilot Program, and may, at the discretion of the secretary, expand the program to include some or all of California Conservation Camps.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “California Conservation Camps” has the same meaning as in Section 4952 of the Public Resources Code.